New York, session 2025-2026, S3236.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 6841 of the education law, as 2 added by chapter 414 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 3 1. A registered pharmacy technician may, under the direct personal 4 supervision of a licensed pharmacist, assist such licensed pharmacist, 5 as directed, in compounding, preparing, labeling, or dispensing of drugs 6 used to fill valid prescriptions or medication orders or in compounding, 7 preparing, and labeling in anticipation of a valid prescription or medi- 8 cation order for a patient to be served by the [facility] pharmacy, in 9 accordance with article one hundred thirty-seven of this title where 10 such tasks require no professional judgment. Such professional judgment 11 shall only be exercised by a licensed pharmacist. A registered pharmacy 12 technician may only practice [in a facility licensed in accordance with 13 article twenty-eight of the public health law, or a pharmacy owned and 14 operated by such a facility,] under the direct personal supervision of a 15 licensed pharmacist employed in such a [facility or] pharmacy. Such 16 [facility] pharmacy shall be responsible for ensuring that the regis- 17 tered pharmacy technician has received appropriate training to ensure 18 competence before [he or she begins assisting] beginning to assist a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02176-03-5 S. 3236--A 2 1 licensed pharmacist in compounding, preparing, labeling, or dispensing 2 of drugs, in accordance with this article and article one hundred thir- 3 ty-seven of this title. For the purposes of this article, direct 4 personal supervision means supervision of procedures based on 5 instructions given directly by a supervising licensed pharmacist who 6 remains in the immediate area where the procedures are being performed, 7 authorizes the procedures and evaluates the procedures performed by the 8 registered pharmacy technicians and a supervising licensed pharmacist 9 shall approve all work performed by the registered pharmacy technician 10 prior to the actual dispensing of any drug. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.